North Carolina statutes. Chapter 130A. Public Health.
Article 4. Vital Statistics.
§ 130A-110.
Registration of marriage certificates.

On or before the fifteenth day of the month, the register of deeds shall transmit to the State Registrar a record of each marriage ceremony performed during the preceding calendar month for which a license was issued by the register of deeds. The State
Registrar shall prescribe a form containing the information required by

G.S. 51-16

and additional information to conform with the requirements of the federal agency responsible for national vital statistics. The form shall be the official form of a marriage license, certificate of marriage and
application for marriage license.

Each form signed and issued by the register of deeds, assistant register of deeds or deputy register of deeds shall constitute an original or a duplicate original. Upon request, the State Registrar shall furnish a true copy of the marriage registration.
The copy shall have the same evidentiary value as the original.

The register of deeds shall provide copies or abstracts of marriage certificates to any person upon request. Certified copies of these certificates shall be provided only to those persons described in G.S. 130A-93(c).

Marriage certificates maintained by the local register of deeds shall be open to inspection and examination.

History.
1961, c. 862; 1969, c. 1031, s. 1; 1973, c. 476, s. 128; 1977, c. 1110, s. 3; 1983, c. 891, s. 2; 1985, c. 325, s. 2; 2001-62, s. 15; 2001-487, s. 83.

§ 130A-111.
Registration of divorces and annulments.

For each divorce and annulment of marriage granted by a court of competent jurisdiction in this State, a report shall be prepared and filed by the clerk of court with the State Registrar. On or before the fifteenth day of each month, the clerk shall forward
to the State Registrar the report of each divorce and annulment granted during the preceding calendar month.

History.
1957, c. 983; 1969, c. 1031, s. 1; 1973, c. 476, s. 128; 1977, c. 1110, s. 2; 1983, c. 891, s. 2; 1985, c. 325, s. 3.

§ 130A-112.
Notification of death.

A funeral director or person acting as such who first assumes custody of a dead body or fetus of 20 completed weeks gestation or more shall submit a notification of death to the local registrar in the county where death occurred, within 24 hours of taking
custody of the body or fetus. The notification of death shall identify the attending physician responsible for medical certification, except that for deaths under the jurisdiction of the medical examiner, the notification shall identify
the medical examiner and certify that the medical examiner has released the body to a funeral director or person acting as such for final disposition.

History.
1913, c. 109, s. 5; 1915, c. 164, s. 1; C.S., s. 7092; 1955, c. 951, s. 9; 1957, c. 1357, s. 1; 1969, c. 1031, s. 1; 1973, c. 873, s. 1; 1983, c. 891, s. 2.

§ 130A-113.
Permits for burial-transit, authorization for cremation and disinterment-reinterment.

The funeral director or person acting as such who first assumes custody of a dead body or fetus which is under the jurisdiction of the medical examiner shall obtain a burial-transit permit signed by the medical examiner prior to final disposition or removal
from the State and within five days after death.

A dead body shall not be cremated or buried at sea unless the provisions of

G.S. 130A-388

are met.

(b1) For any death occurring outside North Carolina, a crematory licensee shall not cremate a dead human body without obtaining a copy of the burial-transit or disposal permit issued under the law of the state, province, or foreign government in which
death or disinterment occurred before cremation. Nothing in this subsection shall be construed to waive the provisions of

G.S. 130A-388

.

A permit for disinterment-reinterment shall be required prior to disinterment of a dead body or fetus except as otherwise authorized by law or rule. The permit shall be issued by the local registrar to a funeral director, embalmer or other person acting
as such upon proper application.

No dead body or fetus shall be brought into this State unless accompanied by a burial-transit or disposal permit issued under the law of the state in which death or disinterment occurred. The permit shall be final authority for final disposition of the
body or fetus in this State.

The local registrar shall issue a burial-transit permit for the removal of a dead body or fetus from this State if the requirements of

G.S. 130A-112

are met and that the death is not under the jurisdiction of the medical examiner.

History.
1973, c. 873, s. 2; 1977, c. 163, s. 2; 1983, c. 891, s. 2; 2019-207, s. 2.

§ 130A-114.
Fetal death registration; certificate of birth resulting in stillbirth.

Each spontaneous fetal death occurring in the State of 20 completed weeks gestation or more, as calculated from the first day of the last normal menstrual period until the day of delivery, shall be reported within 10 days after delivery to the local registrar
of the county in which the delivery occurred. The report shall be made on a form prescribed and furnished by the State Registrar.

When fetal death occurs in a hospital or other medical facility, the person in charge of the facility shall obtain the cause of fetal death and other required medical information over the signature of the attending physician, and shall prepare and file
the report with the local registrar.

When a fetal death occurs outside of a hospital or other medical facility, the physician in attendance at or immediately after the delivery shall prepare and file the report. When a fetal death is attended by a person authorized to attend childbirth,
the supervising physician shall prepare and file the report. Fetal deaths attended by lay midwives and all other persons shall be treated as deaths without medical attendance as provided for in

G.S. 130A-115

and the medical examiner shall prepare and file the report.

For any spontaneous fetal death occurring in this State, either parent of the stillborn child may file an application with the State Registrar requesting a certificate of birth resulting in stillbirth. The certificate of birth resulting in stillbirth
(i) shall be based upon the information available from the fetal death report filed pursuant to this section, (ii) shall not include any reference to the name of the stillborn child if the fetal death report does not include the
name of the stillborn child and the parent filing the application does not elect to provide a name, and (iii) shall clearly indicate that it is not proof of a live birth. If the spontaneous fetal death occurred in this State prior
to July 1, 2001, the State Registrar may not issue a certificate of birth resulting in stillbirth unless the application for the certificate is accompanied by a certified copy of the fetal death report. Issuance of a certificate
of birth resulting in stillbirth does not replace the requirement to file a report of fetal death under this section.

History.
1913, c. 109, s. 6; C.S., s. 7093; 1933, c. 9, s. 2; 1951, c. 1091, s. 1; 1955, c. 951, s. 10; 1957, c. 1357, s. 1; 1969, c. 1031, s. 1; 1973, c. 873, s. 3; 1979, c. 95, s. 1; 1983, c. 891, s. 2; 1989, c. 199, s. 3; 2011-357,
s. 1.

§ 130A-115.
Death registration.

A death certificate for each death which occurs in this State shall be filed with the local registrar of the county in which the death occurred within five days after the death. If the place of death is unknown, a death certificate shall be filed within
five days in the county where the dead body is found. If the death occurs in a moving conveyance, a death certificate shall be filed in the county in which the dead body was first removed from the conveyance.

The funeral director or person acting as such who first assumes custody of a dead body shall file the death certificate with the local registrar. The personal data shall be obtained from the next of kin or the best qualified person or source available.
The funeral director or person acting as such is responsible for obtaining the medical certification of the cause of death, stating facts relative to the date and place of burial, and filing the death certificate with the local
registrar within five days of the death.

The medical certification shall be completed and signed by the physician in charge of the patient’s care for the illness or condition which resulted in death, except when the death falls within the circumstances described in

G.S. 130A-383

. In the absence of the physician or with the physician’s approval, the certificate may be completed and signed by an associate physician, a physician assistant in a manner consistent with G.S. 90-18.1(e1), a nurse
practitioner in a manner consistent with G.S. 90-18.2(e1), the chief medical officer of the hospital or facility in which the death occurred or a physician who performed an autopsy upon the decedent under the following circumstances:
the individual has access to the medical history of the deceased; the individual has viewed the deceased at or after death; and the death is due to natural causes. In the absence of a treating physician, physician assistant, or
nurse practitioner in charge of the patient’s care at the time of death, the chief medical officer of the hospital or facility in which the death occurred, or a physician performing an autopsy, the death certificate may be completed
by any other physician, physician assistant, or nurse practitioner who undertakes reasonable efforts to ascertain the events surrounding the patient’s death. When specifically approved by the State Registrar, an electronic signature
or facsimile signature of the physician, physician assistant, or nurse practitioner shall be acceptable. As used in this section, the term electronic signature has the same meaning as applies in

G.S. 66-58.2

. The physician, physician assistant, or nurse practitioner shall state the cause of death on the certificate in definite and precise terms. A certificate containing any indefinite terms or denoting only symptoms
of disease or conditions resulting from disease as defined by the State Registrar, shall be returned to the person making the medical certification for correction and more definite statement.

(c1) A physician, physician assistant, or nurse practitioner completing and signing a medical certification in accordance with subsection (c) of this section shall not be liable in civil damages for any acts or omissions relating to the medical certification
so long as the cause of death is determined in good faith using the individual’s best clinical judgment and consistent with current guidance provided by the applicable licensing board, unless the acts or omissions amount to
wanton conduct or intentional wrongdoing. This immunity is in addition to any other legal immunity from liability to which these individuals may be entitled.

The physician, physician assistant, nurse practitioner, or medical examiner making the medical certification as to the cause of death shall complete the medical certification no more than three days after death. The physician, physician assistant, nurse
practitioner, or medical examiner may, in appropriate cases, designate the cause of death as unknown pending an autopsy or upon some other reasonable cause for delay, but shall send the supplementary information to the local registrar
as soon as it is obtained.

In the case of death or fetal death without medical attendance, it shall be the duty of the funeral director or person acting as such and any other person having knowledge of the death to notify the local medical examiner of the death. The body shall
not be disposed of or removed without the permission of the medical examiner. If there is no county medical examiner, the Chief Medical Examiner shall be notified.

A physician, physician assistant, or nurse practitioner, who completes a death certificate in good faith, and without fraud or malice, shall be immune from civil liability or professional discipline.

History.
1913, c. 109, ss. 7, 9; C.S., ss. 7094, 7096; 1949, c. 161, s. 1; 1955, c. 951, ss. 11, 12; 1957, c. 1357, s. 1; 1963, c. 492, ss. 1, 2, 4; 1969, c. 1031, s. 1; 1973, c. 476, s. 128; c. 873, s. 5; 1979, c. 95, ss. 2, 3;
1981, c. 187, s. 1; 1983, c. 891, s. 2; 1999-247, s. 1; 2011-197, s. 3; 2019-191, s. 44; 2019-207, s. 3.

§ 130A-116.
Contents of death certificate.

The certificate of death shall contain those items prescribed and specified on the standard certificate of death as prepared by the federal agency responsible for national vital statistics. The State Registrar may require additional information.

History.
1913, c. 109, s. 7; C.S., s. 7094; 1949, c. 161, s. 1; 1955, c. 951, s. 11; 1957, c. 1357, s. 1; 1963, c. 492, ss. 1, 4; 1969, c. 1031, s. 1; 1983, c. 891, s. 2.

§ 130A-117.
Persons required to keep records and provide information.

All persons in charge of hospitals or other institutions, public or private, to which persons resort for confinement or treatment of diseases or to which persons are committed by process of law, shall make a record of personal data concerning each person
admitted or confined to the institution. The record shall include information required for the certificates of birth and death and the reports of spontaneous fetal death required by this Article. The record shall be made at the
time of admission from information provided by the person being admitted or confined. When this information cannot be obtained from this person, it shall be obtained from relatives or other knowledgeable persons.

When a dead body or dead fetus of 20 weeks gestation or more is released or disposed of by an institution, the person in charge of the institution shall keep a record showing the name of the decedent, date of death, name and address of the person to whom
the body or fetus is released and the date of removal from the institution. If final disposition is made by the institution, the date, place, and manner of disposition shall also be recorded.

A funeral director, embalmer, or other person who removes from the place of death, transports or makes final disposition of a dead body or fetus, shall keep a record which shall identify the body, and information pertaining to the receipt, removal, delivery,
burial, or cremation of the body, as may be required by the State Registrar. In addition, that person shall file a certificate or other report required by this Article or the rules of the Commission.

Records maintained under this section shall be retained for a period of not less than three years and shall be made available for inspection by the State Registrar upon request.

History.
1913, c. 109, s. 16; C.S., s. 7104; 1957, c. 1357, s. 1; 1969, c. 1031, s. 1; 1979, c. 95, s. 8; 1983, c. 891, s. 2.

§ 130A-118.
Amendment of birth and death certificates.

After acceptance for registration by the State Registrar, no record made in accordance with this Article shall be altered or changed, except by a request for amendment. The State Registrar may adopt rules governing the form of these requests and the type
and amount of proof required.

A new certificate of birth shall be made by the State Registrar when:

Proof is submitted to the State Registrar that the previously unwed parents of a person have intermarried subsequent to the birth of the person;

Notification is received by the State Registrar from the clerk of a court of competent jurisdiction of a judgment, order or decree disclosing different or additional information relating to the parentage of a person;

Satisfactory proof is submitted to the State Registrar that there has been entered in a court of competent jurisdiction a judgment, order or decree disclosing different or additional information relating to the parentage of a person; or

A written request from an individual is received by the State Registrar to change the sex on that individual’s birth record because of sex reassignment surgery, if the request is accompanied by a notarized statement from the physician who performed the
sex reassignment surgery or from a physician licensed to practice medicine who has examined the individual and can certify that the person has undergone sex reassignment surgery.

A new birth certificate issued under subsection (b) may reflect a change in surname when:

A child is legitimated by subsequent marriage and the parents agree and request that the child’s surname be changed; or

A child is legitimated under

G.S. 49-10

or

G.S. 49-12.1

and the parents agree and request that the child’s surname be changed, or the court orders a change in surname after determination that the change is in the best interests of the child.

For the amendment of a certificate of birth or death after its acceptance for filing, or for the making of a new certificate of birth under this Article, the State Registrar shall be entitled to a fee not to exceed fifteen dollars ($15.00) to be paid
by the applicant.

When a new certificate of birth is made, the State Registrar shall substitute the new certificate for the certificate of birth then on file, and shall forward a copy of the new certificate to the register of deeds of the county of birth. The copy of the
certificate of birth on file with the register of deeds, if any, shall be forwarded to the State Registrar within five days. The State Registrar shall place under seal the original certificate of birth, the copy forwarded by the
register of deeds and all papers relating to the original certificate of birth. The seal shall not be broken except by an order of a court of competent jurisdiction. Thereafter, when a certified copy of the certificate of birth
of the person is issued, it shall be a copy of the new certificate of birth, except when an order of a court of competent jurisdiction shall require the issuance of a copy of the original certificate of birth.

History.
1957, c. 1357, s. 1; 1969, c. 1031, s. 1; 1975, c. 556; 1977, c. 1110, s. 4; 1983, c. 891, s. 2; 2002-126, s. 29A.18(b); 2019-42, s. 3.

§ 130A-119.
Clerk of Court to furnish State Registrar with facts as to paternity of children born out of wedlock when judicially determined.

Upon the entry of a judgment determining the paternity of a child born out of wedlock, the clerk of court of the county in which the judgment is entered shall notify the State Registrar in writing of the name of the person against whom the judgment has
been entered, together with the other facts disclosed by the record as may assist in identifying the record of the birth of the child as it appears in the office of the State Registrar. If the judgment is modified or vacated, that
fact shall be reported by the clerk to the State Registrar in the same manner. Upon receipt of the notification, the State Registrar shall record the information upon the birth certificate of the child.

History.
1941, c. 297, s. 1; 1955, c. 951, s. 19; 1957, c. 1357, s. 1; 1969, c. 1031, s. 1; 1971, c. 444, s. 5; 1983, c. 891, s. 2; 2013-198, s. 26.

Effect of Amendments.

Session Laws 2013-198, s. 26, effective June 26, 2013, substituted “children born out of wedlock when” for “illegitimate children” in the section heading; substituted “a child born out of wedlock” for “an illegitimate child” in the first sentence; and,
in the last sentence, deleted “illegitimate” preceding “child.”

Legal Periodicals.

For note, “Family Law—Lovers’ Triangle Turns Bermuda Triangle: The Natural Father’s Right to Rebut the Marital Presumption—Michael H. v. Gerald D.,” see 25 Wake Forest L. Rev. 617 (1990).

§ 130A-120.
Certification of birth dates furnished to veterans’ organizations.

Upon application by any veterans’ organization in this State in connection with junior or youth baseball, the State Registrar shall furnish certification of dates of birth without the payment of the fees prescribed in this Article.

History.
1931, c. 318; 1939, c. 353; 1945, c. 996; 1955, c. 951, s. 24; 1957, c. 1357, s. 1; 1969, c. 1031, s. 1; 1973, c. 476, s. 128; 1983, c. 891, s. 2.

§ 130A-121.
List of deceased residents for county jury commission and Commissioner of Motor Vehicles.

Repealed by Session Laws 2012-180, s. 12, effective July 12, 2012.

The State Registrar shall provide to the Commissioner of Motor Vehicles an alphabetical list of all residents of the State who have died in the two years prior to July 1 of each odd-numbered year, unless an annual jury list is being prepared under

G.S. 9-2(a)

, in which case the list shall be of all residents of the State who have died in the year prior to July 1 of each year. The list shall include the name and address of each deceased resident and may be in either printed
or computerized form, as requested by the Commissioner of Motor Vehicles.

History.
2007-512, s. 2; 2012-180, s. 12.

Effect of Amendments.

Session Laws 2012-180, s. 12, effective July 12, 2012, repealed subsection (a), which read: “The State Registrar shall provide to each county’s jury commission an alphabetical list of all residents of that county who have died in the two years prior to
July 1 of each odd-numbered year, unless an annual jury list is being prepared under

G.S. 9-2(a)

, in which case the list shall be of all residents of the county who have died in the year prior to July 1 of each year. The list shall include the name and address of each deceased resident and may be in either printed
or computerized form, as requested by the jury commission.”

§§ 130A-122 through 130A-123.

Reserved for future codification purposes.